California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) The department has conducted a compliance review pursuant to Section 18023 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and the contractor has failed to clear items of fiscal and programmatic noncompliance identified in the review within 12 months of the issuance of the compliance review report, as described in Section 18001 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) The contractor has in place, or places, a person in a position of
 fiscal responsibility or control who has been convicted of a crime involving misuse or misappropriation of state or federal funds, or a state or federal crime involving moral turpitude, as described in Section 10399.

(5) The contractor was previously awarded expansion funding and has not yet begun to provide services with that funding.

(6) The department has evidence that the contractor has not been able to successfully fulfill current contract requirements by serving children in a quality program and in a fiscally responsible manner

(7) The contractor has a delinquent audit with the department, as described in Section 18073 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) The department shall collaborate with the State Department of Education to
 ensure, when applicable, and not in conflict with statutory or regulatory provisions, that the streamlined request for application process for childcare and development programs is similar to the streamlined request for application process in the California state preschool programs.

(d) The department has authority to consider scoring criteria as necessary to award contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 21.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10245.

(a) Beginning on or before July 1, 2027, the department may set aside up to 15 percent of funding associated with slot expansion awards for general childcare and development programs pursuant to this chapter to fund minor repairs, infrastructure upgrades, and other readiness activities for childcare and development programs.

(b) The department shall establish the process, including eligibility criteria, by which the funds described in subdivision (a) shall be awarded to contractors. The guidelines and procedures shall include, but are not limited to, criteria for funding eligibility, criteria for approved projects or activities, and appropriate timeframes for funding utilization.

(c) Funds awarded pursuant to this section shall be utilized for approved projects or activities within the timeframe established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) The department may rescind funding awarded pursuant to this section for reasons that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Awarded funds have not been, or are not expected to be, utilized within the timeframe established by the department.

(2) Awarded funds have been, or are expected to be, utilized for projects or activities that have not been approved by the department.

(3) Awarded funds have been, or are expected to be, utilized in a manner inconsistent with the guidelines and procedures established by the department.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may administer and implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of childcare bulletins or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted.

(f) This section shall only be implemented to the extent not prohibited by federal law, regulation, and directives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 28.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Family Child Care Home Education Networks [10250. - 10252.]

10250.

(a) The department, with funds appropriated for this purpose, shall contract with entities organized under law to operate family child care home education networks that support educational objectives for children in licensed family child care homes that serve families eligible for subsidized child care.

(b) Family child care home education network programs shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Age and developmentally appropriate activities for children.

(2) Care and supervision of children.

(3) Parenting education.

(4) Identification of child and family social or health needs and referral of the child or the family to the appropriate social or health services.

(5) Nutrition.

(6) Training and support for the family child care home education network’s family child care providers and staff.

(7) Assessment of each family child care provider to ensure that services are of high quality and are educationally and developmentally appropriate.

(8) Developmental profiles for children enrolled in the program.

(9) Parent involvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10251.

Each family child care home education network contractor, in addition to the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 10250, shall do all of the following:

(a) Recruit, enroll, and certify eligible families.

(b) Recruit, train, support, and reimburse licensed family child care providers.

(c) Collect family fees in accordance with contract requirements.

(d) Assess, according to standards set by the department, the educational quality of the program offered in each family child care home in the network.

(e) Assure that a developmental profile is completed for each child based upon observations of network staff, in consultation with the provider.

(f) Monitor requirements, including quality standards, and conduct periodic assessments of program quality in each family child care home affiliated with the network.

(g) Ensure that basic health and nutrition requirements are met.

(h) Provide data and reporting in accordance with contract requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10252.

This chapter does not impose any new requirement on a family child care home education network, nor does this chapter require any increase in reimbursement rates. This chapter does not require the department to modify its contracting procedure that was in effect for a family child care home education network prior to January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Child Care and Development Services for Children with Special Needs [10260. - 10263.]

10260.

(a) The department shall ensure that eligible children with exceptional needs are given equal access to all child care and development programs. Available federal and state funds for children with exceptional needs above the standard reimbursement amount shall be used to assist agencies in developing and supporting appropriate programs for these children.

(b) To provide children with exceptional needs with additional access to child care and development programs, the department shall establish alternate appropriate placements, such as self-contained programs and innovative programs using the least restrictive environment. These programs shall be started as expansion funds become available and shall be expanded throughout the
 implementation of the plan. The department shall utilize existing program models and input from program specialists to develop new program criteria and guidelines for programs serving children with exceptional needs. These programs may serve children with exceptional needs up to 21 years of age.

(c) Any child with exceptional needs served in child care and development programs shall be afforded all rights and protections guaranteed in state and federal laws and regulations for individuals with exceptional needs.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department may develop unique reimbursement rates for, and make reimbursements to, child care and development programs that received state funding for the 1980–81 fiscal year and serve severely disabled children, as defined in subdivision (y) of Section 10213.5, when all of the following conditions exist:

(1) Eligibility for enrollment of a severely disabled child in the program is the sole basis of the child’s need for service.

(2) Services are provided to severely disabled children from birth to 21 years of age.

(3) No fees are charged to the parents of the severely disabled children receiving the services.

(e) The department shall include child care and development providers in all personnel development for persons providing services for children with exceptional needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10261.

A contractor providing services pursuant to a general child care contract, a campus child care contract, a migrant child care contract, or an alternative payment child care contract is subject to the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101, et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10262.

(a) All child care and development programs shall include plans or programs, or both, for the care of the children when they are sick. These plans shall be age appropriate and parents shall be included in the planning and evaluation. The department shall disseminate information regarding effective sick child care models to all child care and development programs.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow the practice of medicine without a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10263.

(a) The department and the local county welfare department shall enter into contracts which establish the procedures for serving and referring a child in need of care as part of the provision of protective services pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 4. The department may contract with another appropriate community agency which provides services or referrals, or both, for the prevention or intervention of child abuse or neglect if no such contract for child care services exists between the department and the county welfare department.

(b) The contracts shall specify the resource and referral program or operating agency or agencies providing child care and development pursuant to this chapter in the county that
 the local contracting agency shall contact to secure care for a child needing protective services. If an operating agency is unable to enroll the child, the local contracting agency described in subdivision (a) with the assistance of the providers of local resources and referral services shall locate services for the family. Payments for such located services in the absence of other funds shall be made by the local contracting agency.

(c) The need for child care funded pursuant to this section shall be reviewed by the local contracting agency no less than every three months.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Administration [10265. - 10277.6.]

10265.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the effectiveness of child care and development programs can be increased through improved state administration, technical assistance to provider agencies, and monitoring.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature:

(1) That the department develop clear, consistent, and appropriate regulations for child care and development programs to replace policy guidelines which are not subject to the public hearing process, often inconsistent, and without the force of law.

(2) That the department make better use of staff with direct field experience in child development
 programs.

(3) That better criteria be developed for the awarding, evaluating, and renewal of child care and development contracts.

(4) That improvements be made in the method of reimbursing child care and development program providers.

(5) That increased effort be made to provide program operators with technical assistance in meeting their contractual obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10265.5.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish a toll-free number for programs which receive funds from the state department pursuant to this chapter and which are in need of technical assistance to the extent that funds are made available for the purposes of this subdivision by Senate Bill 1674 of the 1984 portion of the 1983–84 Regular Session. This subdivision shall become inoperative on and after January 1, 1986.

(b) Gather information and act as a central clearinghouse on parenting materials.

(c) Develop procedures for annually evaluating the field services and the program support which is to be provided to the
 contracting agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10266.

The department shall do all of the following in administering the provisions of this chapter:

(a) Apply sanctions against contracting agencies that have serious licensing violations, as defined and reported by the department pursuant to Section 1597.11 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Except in the case of immediate terminations taken pursuant to Sections 10398 and 10399, provide 90 days’ written notification to any contractor whose agreement is being terminated. Notwithstanding Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 10390), the department shall establish procedures for placing a contractor whose agreement is being terminated into receivership. Action to initiate receivership shall be at the
 discretion of the department, and may be taken against a contractor whose agreement is being terminated either immediately or within 90 days. The receiver shall not be a department employee. The receiver shall have sufficient experience in the administration of child care and development programs to ensure compliance with the terms of the receivership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10266.5.

(a) No person employed by the department in a policymaking position in the area of child care and development programs shall serve as a member of the board of directors, advisory council, or advisory committee for any agency receiving funds pursuant to this chapter. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any person appointed prior to January 1, 1985.

(b) No retired, dismissed, separated, or formerly employed person of the state department employed under the State Civil Service or otherwise appointed to serve in the state department may enter into a contract pursuant to Section 10268.5 in which the person engaged in any of the negotiations, transactions, planning, arrangements, or any part of the decisionmaking process
 relevant to the contract while employed in any capacity by the department. The prohibition contained in this subdivision shall apply to the person only during the two-year period beginning on the date the person left state employment.

(c) For a period of 12 months following the date of their retirement, dismissal, or separation from state service, no person employed under State Civil Service or otherwise appointed to serve in the state department may enter into a contract pursuant to Section 10268.5 if they were employed by the department in a policymaking position in the area of child care and development programs within the 12-month period prior to their retirement, dismissal, or separation.

(d) For a period of 12 months following the date of their retirement, dismissal, or separation from state service, no person employed under State Civil Service or otherwise appointed to
 serve in the department may be employed by a contractor pursuant to Section 10268.5 if they engaged in any of the negotiations, transactions, planning, arrangements, or any part of the decisionmaking process relevant to the contract while employed in any capacity by the department.

(e) The provisions of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) shall not apply to any persons who were already in the situations described by these subdivisions prior to January 1, 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10267.

The department shall develop and coordinate resources, provide technical assistance, monitor program implementation, generate maximum federal reimbursement wherever possible for the federally eligible children, and facilitate alternative funding for those children for whom federal funds are not available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10267.5.

(a) The department shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to this chapter. The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, provisions that do all of the following:

(1) Provide clear guidelines for the selection of agencies when child development contracts are let, including, but not limited to, specification that any agency headquartered in the proposed service area on January 1, 1985, will be given priority for a new contract in that area, unless the department makes a written determination that (A) the agency is not able to deliver the level of services specified in the request for proposal, or (B) the department has notified the agency that it is not in compliance with the terms of its contract.

(2) Provide for a contract monitoring system to ensure that agencies expend funds received pursuant to this chapter in accordance with the provisions of their contracts.

(3) Specify adequate standards of agency performance.

(4) Establish reporting requirements for service reports, including provisions for varying the frequency with which these reports are to be submitted on the basis of agency performance.

(5) Specify standards for withholding payments to agencies that fail to submit required fiscal reports.

(6) Set forth standards for department site visits to contracting agencies, including, but not limited to, specification as to the purpose of the visits, the personnel that will perform
 these visits, and the frequency of these visits which shall be as frequently as staff and budget resources permit.

(7) Authorize the department to develop a process that may require every contracting agency to recompete for continued funding no less frequently than every five years.

(b) For purposes of expediting the implementation of state or federal legislation to expand childcare services, the department may do any of the following:

(1) Utilize an alternative application process in which the department will evaluate the ability and standing of existing contractors in determining allocation methodology and eligibility for funding.

(2) Waive the regulations regarding the point qualifications for, and the process and scoring of, applications of contract applicants pursuant to Section 18002 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Waive the time limitations for scheduling and notification of appeal hearings and their results pursuant to Section 18003 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. The department shall ensure that the appeal hearings provided for in Section 18003 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations are conducted in a timely manner.

(c) (1) Childcare and development
 programs operated under contract from funds made available pursuant to the federal Child Care and Development Fund shall be administered according to Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 17906) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, unless provisions of these regulations conflict with federal regulations. If state and federal regulations conflict, the federal regulations shall apply unless a waiver of federal regulations is authorized.

(2) For purposes of this section, “Child Care and Development Fund” has the same meaning as in Section 98.2 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 73, Sec. 22.   (SB 163)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10267.6.

(a) The director may require a contracting agency that employs a person who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to Section 8301.1 to provide the department with data that includes the number of employees in its program who hold an assistant teacher permit pursuant to Section 8301.1 or who qualified for waivers pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section
 10242. The data may be collected by survey or by another collection method. The data shall be provided to the department as part the contracting agency’s annual plan for its program self-evaluation process as required by Section 17709 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or a successor statute or regulation, or as part of an existing reporting process determined by the director.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the director may develop informal directives and bulletins to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 165, Sec. 4.   (AB 753)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10268.

For purposes of meeting state and federal reporting requirements and for the effective administration of child care and development programs, the department is authorized to require the collection and submission of social security numbers of heads of households, and other information as required, from public and private agencies contracting with the department pursuant to this part, including local educational agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10268.5.

Notwithstanding Section 14616 of the Government Code, the department may enter into and execute local contractual agreements with any public or private entity or agency for the delivery of child care and development services or the furnishing of property, facilities, personnel, supplies, equipment, and administrative services related to the delivery of child care development services. Prior to entering into or executing a local agreement, the department shall obtain annual approval from the Department of General Services and the Department of Finance as to the form and general content thereof. The agreements may only be made for the delivery of child care and development services, or the furnishing of property, facilities, personnel, supplies, equipment, or administrative services related thereto, which conform with the
 provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10269.

Contractors operating or providing services pursuant to this chapter may do both of the following:

(a) (1) Maintain records electronically, in compliance with state and federal standards, as determined by the department. A conversion from a paper record to an electronic format, as well as the storage of the electronic record, shall comply with the minimum standards described in Section 12168.7 of the Government Code and the standards for trustworthy electronic document or record preservation described in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 22620.1) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The records shall be retained by each contractor for at
 least five years, or, where an audit has been requested by a state agency, until the date the audit is resolved, whichever is longer.

(3) This subdivision does not require a contractor to create records electronically.

(b) (1) Use a digital signature that complies with state and federal standards, as determined by the department, that may be a marking that is either computer generated or produced by electronic means and is intended by the signatory to have the same effect as a handwritten signature.

(2) The use of a digital signature shall have the same force and effect as the use of a manual signature if the requirements for the digital signatures and their acceptable technology, as provided in Section 16.5 of the Government Code and in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 7
 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, are satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10269.5.

Contractors operating or providing services pursuant to this chapter may use digital forms to allow families to apply for services, if those forms comply with state and federal standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.

On and after the date on which the department determines that the Financial Information System for California (Fi$Cal Project) has been implemented within the department, at the request of a contractor, for a contract executed by the department pursuant to Section 10268.5, the department shall request the Controller to make a payment via direct deposit by electronic funds transfer through the Fi$Cal Project into the contractor’s account at the financial institution of the contractor’s choice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.5.

(a) In contract transfer situations in programs funded pursuant to this chapter, the department may grant a certificate of operation to child care and development facilities pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of maintaining continuity of services to children and receipt of state and federal child nutrition and child development funding, the department may grant a certificate of operation to any child care and development facility which meets all of the following conditions:

(1) A representative of the department has visited the facility and verified, in writing, to the department’s licensing agency that the facility has no deficiencies at the time of granting the
 certificate of operation which would endanger the physical health, mental health, safety, or welfare of the children.

(2) Without a certificate of operation in lieu of a license from the department, the facility would be ineligible to receive state and federal child nutrition or child development funds.

(c) A facility issued a certificate of operation pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be operating under licensing standards for child care and development facilities specified by Chapters 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70), 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90), and 3.6 (commencing with Section 1597.30) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and by Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations for the term specified on the certificate.

(d) A facility granted a certificate of operation shall submit a
 completed license application to the department within 15 working days of the issuance of the certificate of operation. Failure to meet this requirement will result in the cancellation of the certificate of operation. The certificate of operation shall expire upon the issuance or denial of a license by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10271.

(a) (1) The department shall adopt rules and regulations on eligibility, enrollment, and priority of services needed to implement this part. In order to be eligible for federal and state subsidized child development services, families shall meet at least one requirement in each of the following areas:

(A) A family is (i) a current aid recipient, (ii) income eligible, (iii) homeless, (iv) one whose children are recipients of protective services, or whose children have been identified as being abused, neglected, or exploited, or at risk of being abused, neglected, or exploited, or (v) one who has a member of its household who is certified to receive benefits from Medi-Cal, CalFresh, the California Food Assistance Program, the California
 Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, the federal Food Distribution Program on Indian Reservations, Head Start, Early Head Start, or any other designated means-tested government program, as determined by the department. If a family is deemed eligible pursuant to clause (v), the family shall be prioritized by the income declared on the application for the means-tested government program.

(B) A family needs the childcare services (i) because the child is identified by a legal, medical, or social services agency, a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a Head Start program, or an emergency or transitional shelter as (I) a recipient of protective services, (II) being neglected, abused, or exploited, or at risk of neglect, abuse, or exploitation, or (III) being homeless, (ii) because the parents are (I) engaged in vocational training leading directly to a recognized trade, paraprofession, or profession, (II) engaged in an educational program for English language learners or to attain a high school diploma or general educational development certificate, (III) employed or seeking employment, (IV) seeking permanent housing for family stability, or (V) incapacitated, or (iii) because the families are eligible for Stage Two and Stage Three and are participating in a CalWORKs program activity.

(2) If only one parent has signed an application for enrollment in childcare services, as required by this part or regulations adopted to implement this part, and the information provided on the application indicates that there is a second parent who has not signed the application, the parent who has signed the application shall self-certify the presence or absence of the second parent under penalty of perjury. The parent who has signed the application shall not be required to submit additional information documenting the presence or absence of the second parent.

(b) Except as provided in Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370), priority for federal and state subsidized child development services is as follows:

(1) First priority shall be given to neglected or abused children who are recipients of child protective services, or children who are at risk of being neglected or abused, upon written referral from a legal, medical, or social services agency. If an agency is unable to enroll a child in the first priority category, the agency shall refer the family to local resource and referral services to locate services for the child.

(2) Second priority shall be given equally to eligible families, regardless of the number of parents in the home, who are income eligible. Within this priority, families with the lowest gross monthly income in relation to family size, as determined by a schedule adopted by the department, shall be
 admitted first. If two or more families are in the same priority in relation to income, the family that has a child with exceptional needs shall be admitted first. If there is no family of the same priority with a child with exceptional needs, the family of the same priority in which the primary home language is a language other than English shall be admitted first. If there is no family of the same priority in which the primary home language is a language other than English, the family of the same priority that has been on the waiting list for the longest time shall be admitted first. For purposes of determining order of admission, grants of public assistance recipients shall be counted as income.

(3) The department shall set criteria for, and may grant specific waivers of, the priorities established in this subdivision for agencies that wish to serve specific populations, including children with exceptional needs or children of prisoners.
 These new waivers shall not include proposals to avoid appropriate fee schedules or admit ineligible families, but may include proposals to accept members of special populations in other than strict income order, as long as appropriate fees are paid.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, in order to promote continuity of services, a family enrolled in a state or federally funded childcare and development program whose services would otherwise be terminated because the family no longer meets the program income, eligibility, or need criteria may continue to receive child development services in another state or federally funded childcare and development program if the contractor is able to transfer the family’s enrollment to another program for which the family is eligible before the date of termination of services or to exchange the family’s existing enrollment with the enrollment of a family in another program, provided that both families satisfy
 the eligibility requirements for the program in which they are being enrolled. The transfer of enrollment may be to another program within the same administrative agency or to another agency that administers state or federally funded childcare and development programs.

(d) A physical examination and evaluation, including age-appropriate immunization, shall be required before, or within six weeks of, enrollment. A standard, rule, or regulation shall not require medical examination or immunization for admission to a childcare and development program of a child whose parent or guardian files a letter with the governing board of the childcare and development program stating that the medical examination or immunization is contrary to the parent’s or guardian’s religious beliefs, or provide for the exclusion of a child from the program because of a parent or guardian having filed the letter. However, if there is good cause to believe that a child is
 suffering from a recognized contagious or infectious disease, the child shall be temporarily excluded from the program until the governing board of the childcare and development program is satisfied that the child is not suffering from that contagious or infectious disease.

(e) Regulations formulated and promulgated pursuant to this section shall include the recommendations of the State Department of Health Care Services relative to health care screening and the provision of health care services. The department shall seek the advice and assistance of these health authorities in situations where service under this part includes or requires care of children who are ill or children with exceptional needs.

(f) The department shall establish guidelines for the collection of employer-sponsored childcare benefit payments from a parent whose child receives subsidized childcare and
 development services. These guidelines shall provide for the collection of the full amount of the benefit payment, but not to exceed the actual cost of childcare and development services provided, notwithstanding the applicable fee based on the fee schedule.

(g) The department shall establish guidelines according to which the director or a duly authorized representative of the childcare and development program will certify children as eligible for state reimbursement pursuant to this section.

(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) to (5), inclusive, upon establishing initial eligibility or ongoing eligibility for services under this part, a family shall be considered to meet all eligibility and need requirements for those services for not less than 24 months, shall receive those services for not less than 24 months before having their eligibility or
 need recertified, and shall not be required to report changes to income or other changes for at least 24 months.

(2) In the event that the eligibility period as described in paragraph (1) ends before the end of a program year, eligibility shall be extended until the end of the program year, as long as applicable age-eligibility requirements are met, as specified in Section 10213.5.

(3) A family that establishes initial eligibility or ongoing eligibility on the basis of income shall report increases in income that exceed the threshold for ongoing income eligibility as described in subdivision (b) of Section 10271.5, and the family’s ongoing eligibility for services shall at that time be recertified.

(4) A family may at any time voluntarily report income or other changes. This information shall be used, as applicable,
 to reduce the family’s fees, increase the family’s services, or extend the period of the family’s eligibility before recertification.

(5) If a family already receiving services pursuant to this part adds an additional child to the family size and the family requests services for that child during the current eligibility period, the family’s eligibility period shall be extended, as necessary, to ensure that the additional child receives at least 12 months of eligibility for services before a redetermination of eligibility, as required pursuant to Section 98.21 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(i) (1) Because a family that meets eligibility requirements at its most recent eligibility certification or recertification is considered eligible until the next recertification, as provided in subdivision (h), a payment made by a child development program
 for a child during this period shall not be considered an error or an improper payment due to a change in the family’s circumstances during that same period.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department may seek to recover payments that are the result of fraud.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5 of the Education Code, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State to implement subdivision (h), the department shall implement subdivision (h) through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before October 1, 2017.

(2) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement subdivision
 (h) on or before December 31, 2018. The department shall convene a workgroup of parents, advocates, department staff, child development program representatives, and other stakeholders to develop recommendations regarding implementing subdivision (h).

(k) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and Section 33308.5 of the Education Code, until regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the department shall implement the changes made to subdivision (h) by the act that added this subdivision through management bulletins or similar letters of instruction on or before December 1, 2023.

(2) The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to implement the changes made to subdivision (h) by the act that added this
 subdivision on or before December 31, 2024.
